District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Automatic Enrollment for Utility Affordability Programs Act of 2025”.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon request by the Department of Energy
and Environment (“DOEE”) for the purposes described in subsections (b) and (c), the following
agencies shall provide, or cause to be provided, the information listed below to DOEE, including
personal identifying information:
(1) For the Department of Human Services (“DHS”), enrollment data from
households participating in any program administered by DHS, the eligibility of which is based on
household income, including the District’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (“TANF”)


Program, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (“SNAP”), or the Special Supplemental
Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children (“WIC”); and
(2) For the Department of Health Care Finance (“DHCF”), enrollment data for
households participating in any program administered by DHCF, the eligibility of which is based
on household income, including Medicaid.
(b)(1) DOEE, in consultation with the Public Service Commission and the Office of
People’s Counsel, shall launch a system for automatically enrolling eligible households in DOEE’s
income-qualified utility affordability programs within one year of the effective date of this act.
(2) If funds are not available to automatically enroll all eligible households, DOEE
may prioritize automatic enrollment for households in the following order of need:
(A) Low-income households experiencing severe energy burden;
(B) Low-income households experiencing high energy burden; and
(C) Low-income households.
(3) DOEE may prioritize which of its utility affordability programs into which it
automatically enrolls households.
(c)(1) DOEE shall use the information obtained as described in subsection (a) to
automatically enroll eligible household using the system launched pursuant to subsection (b)(1).
(2) The system developed pursuant to subsection (b)(1) shall:
(A) Require affirmative consent from a member of the household prior to
automatically enrolling that household, in a manner to be determined by the Mayor;
(B) Allow households to decline, opt out, or withdraw from automatic
enrollment at any time;


(C) Include a data-sharing protocol that ensures that individuals’ personal
identifying information, including the individual’s name, account number, service address, phone
number, shall not be shared for purposes other than automatic enrollment in utility affordability
programs without the individual’s affirmative consent; and
(D) No later than 60 days after enrolling an eligible household pursuant to
subsection (c)(1), inform the household:
(i) That the household has been automatically enrolled in utility
affordability programs;
(ii) The anticipated date by which the household will begin receiving
benefits through the utility affordability program in which the household was enrolled; and
(iii) What the anticipated monthly benefits will be through the utility
affordability program.
(4) If the development of a new, or updates to an existing, case management system
or information technology management system are needed to implement the requirements of this
subsection, DOEE shall endeavor to develop or update that system in a way that allows for other
District agencies to:
(A) Input information related to household income obtained from sources
other than those listed in subsection (a) of this section; and
(B) Automatically enroll households into income-qualified programs
administered by District agencies other than those specified in subsection (b)(1) of this section.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as provided
in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia
Register.